Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB6367.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 9. (1) The authority shall is not be required to pay taxes on property owned by the authority under this act or upon on the income derived from the property. The bonds issued under this act, their the transfer of the bonds, and the income derived from the bonds, including a profit made on the sale of the bonds, shall be are exempt from taxation by the this state, a local unit of government or political subdivision, or other instrumentality of the this state, notwithstanding that the interest may be subject to federal income tax. (2) Bonds issued under this act and the interest coupons, if any, attached to the bonds shall be are fully negotiable and have all of the qualities incident to negotiable instruments under the uniform commercial code, Act No. 174 of the Public Acts of 1962, as amended, being sections 440.1101 to 440.11102 of the Michigan Compiled Laws, 1962 PA 174, MCL 440.1101 to 440.12501, subject only to the provisions for registration of the bonds which that may appear on the bonds. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect unless House Bill No. 6347 (request no. H02809'25) of the 103rd Legislature is enacted into law.